Hawaii statutes.
[§183D-4.5] Game management advisory
commission. (a) There is established within the department a game
management advisory commission, which shall serve in an advisory capacity to
the board. The game management advisory commission shall consist of nine
members to be appointed by the governor in the manner provided in section
26-34. Membership on the game management advisory commission shall include:

(1) One member from the county of Kauai;

(2) Three members from the county of Maui, with one
member from each of the islands of Maui, Lanai, and Molokai;

(3) Two members from the county of Hawaii, with one
member from east Hawaii and one member from west Hawaii;

(4) One member from the city and county of Honolulu;

(5) One at-large member; and

(6) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designated representative, who shall serve as an
ex officio, voting member;

provided that each member, other than the
chairperson of the board, shall be a hunter licensed in the State under this
chapter and shall have leadership experience in working directly with local
hunter or shooting organizations; at least one member shall have knowledge,
experience, and expertise in the area of native Hawaiian cultural practices;
and no more than three members shall represent, be employed by, or be under
contract to any sector of government.

(b) The game management advisory commission
shall select its own chairperson from among its members. The members shall
receive no compensation for their services on the game management advisory
commission but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses,
including travel expenses, while attending meetings and while in the discharge
of their duties.

(c) The game management advisory commission
may recommend policies and criteria regarding the management, protection, and
promotion of public hunting in Hawaii and may recommend amendments to existing
department policies and procedures relating to hunting, particularly regarding
this chapter and chapters 122, 123, and 124 of title 13, Hawaii Administrative
Rules.

(d) The game management advisory commission
shall:

(1) Consult and advise the board on any matter
affecting hunting, including proposed rules and regulations;

(2) Assist in the evaluation and development of game
management plans as appropriate or required and any changes to those plans as
necessary;

(3) Assist in establishing criteria to be used in
determining whether an area is suitable for hunting;

(4) Advise on studies of areas for sustainable yield
game production or enhancement;

(5) Recommend to the board the areas that are
suitable for game production or enhancement;

(6) Recommend policies and criteria regarding the
management, protection, and permitted uses of areas that are used for hunting;

(7) Assist the department in developing ways and
means to extend and strengthen game management areas, other designated hunting
areas, and mixed-use areas within the State;

(8) In carrying out its duties, consult the most
comprehensive up-to-date compilation of scientific data;

(9) Make recommendations relating to the process of
hunting rules modification;

(10) Collaborate with agencies and other persons who
gather information and implement hunting programs and data;

(11) Take testimony and acquire information as it
desires and communicate its findings and recommendations to the board; and

(12) Assist the department on policies, plans, and
procedures related to the control of game mammals, including aerial shooting
activities by the department and its contractors.

(e) Any action taken by the game management
advisory commission shall be validated by a simple majority of its members.
Five members shall constitute a quorum.

(f) All meetings of the game management
advisory commission shall be conducted subject to chapter 92.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, the game management advisory commission shall be subject to sections
26‑34, 26-35, 26-35.5, and 26-36.

(h) The department shall provide
administrative support to the game management advisory commission. Federal
moneys and other moneys that become available to the department may be used to
offset administrative costs incurred by the department for purposes of this
subsection.

(i) The game management advisory commission
shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the regular session of 2017, and each regular session thereafter,
on its efforts to comply with this section, including a summary of its
activities during the year preceding the regular session for which the report
was prepared.

(j) The game management advisory commission
may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section. [L 2016, c
210, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next